Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1918
Permit fees; installation or repair without permit; penalty.

The city or village which has jurisdiction of the construction or repair of the sanitary plumbing shall be entitled to permit fees, according to its ordinance. Any person, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or other legal entity making installation or repair of sanitary plumbing in any building except a single-family dwelling without the required permit from the city or village shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction thereof, be fined not less than fifty dollars nor more than five hundred dollars.

Laws 1969, c. 100, § 4, p. 475;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 142.